California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(f) A health care practitioner who issues a prescription for a controlled substance but does not transmit the prescription as an electronic data transmission prescription shall document the reason in the patient’s medical record as soon as practicable and within 72 hours of the end of the technological or electrical failure that prevented the electronic data transmission of the prescription.

(g) (1) A pharmacy that receives an electronic data transmission prescription from a prescribing health care practitioner who has issued the prescription but has not dispensed the medication to the patient shall, at the request of the patient or a person authorized to make a request on behalf of the patient, immediately transfer or forward the electronic data transmission prescription to an alternative pharmacy designated by the requester, unless one of the following applies:

(A) The action would result in a violation of any state or federal law.

(B) The action is not supported by the latest version of the National Council for Prescription Drug Programs SCRIPT standard, as amended from time to
 time.

(2) If a pharmacy is prohibited from transferring or forwarding electronic data transmission prescriptions, as specified in paragraph (1), to a designated alternative pharmacy, and that prohibition is subsequently removed, then that pharmacy shall implement, within one year from the date the prohibition is removed, the necessary provisions to allow for the transferring or forwarding of an electronic data transmission prescription.

(h) If a pharmacy, or its staff, is aware than an attempted transmission of an electronic data transmission prescription failed, is incomplete, or is otherwise not appropriately received, the pharmacy shall immediately notify the prescribing health care practitioner.

(i) A
 pharmacist who receives a written, oral, or faxed prescription shall not be required to verify that the prescription properly falls under one of the exceptions in subdivision (e). Pharmacists may continue to dispense medications from legally valid written, oral, or fax prescriptions pursuant to this division.

(j) A health care practitioner, pharmacist, or pharmacy who fails to meet the applicable requirements of this section shall be referred to the appropriate state professional licensing board solely for administrative sanctions, as deemed appropriate by that board. This section does not create a private right of action against a health care practitioner. This section does not limit a health care practitioner’s liability for the negligent failure to diagnose or treat a patient.

(k) This section shall not apply to a health care practitioner, pharmacist, or pharmacy when providing health care services to an inmate, individual on parole, or youth under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   (AB 852)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Selection of Healing Arts Practitioner [690. - 690.]

690.

(a) Except as provided in Section 4601 of the Labor Code and Section 2627 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, neither the administrators, agents, or employees of any program supported, in whole or in part, by funds of the State of California, nor any state agency, county, or city of the State of California, nor any officer, employee, agent, or governing board of a state agency, county, or city in the performance of its, his, or her duty, duties, function, or functions, shall prohibit any person, who is entitled to vision care that may be rendered by either an optometrist or a physician and surgeon within the scope of his or her license, from selecting a duly licensed member of either profession to render the service, provided the member has not been removed or suspended from participation in the program for cause.

(b) Whenever any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices that constitute, or will constitute, a violation of this section, the superior court in and for the county wherein the acts or practices take place, or are about to take place, may issue an injunction, or other appropriate order, restraining the conduct on application of the Attorney General, the district attorney of the county, or any person aggrieved.

For purposes of this subdivision, “person aggrieved” means the person who seeks the particular medical or optometric services mentioned in this section, or the holder of any certificate who is discriminated against in violation of this section.

(c) Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit any agency operating a program of services, including, but not limited to, a program established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, from preparing lists of healing arts licensees and requiring patients to select a licensee on the list as a condition to payment by the program for the services, except that if the lists are established and a particular service may be performed by either a physician and surgeon or an optometrist the list shall contain a sufficient number of licensees so as to assure the patients an adequate choice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Inactive License [700. - 704.]

700.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish in this article an inactive category of health professionals’ licensure. Such inactive licenses or certificates are intended to allow a person who has a license or certificate in one of the healing arts, but who is not actively engaged in the practice of his or her profession, to maintain licensure or certification in a nonpracticing status.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 410.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

(a) As used in this article, “board” refers to any healing arts board, division, or examining committee which licenses or certifies health professionals.

(b) Each healing arts board referred to in this division shall issue, upon application and payment of the normal renewal fee, an inactive license or certificate to a current holder of an active license or certificate whose license or certificate is not suspended, revoked, or
 otherwise punitively restricted by that board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 249, Sec. 1.   (AB 1659)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

The holder of an inactive healing arts license or certificate issued pursuant to this article shall not do any of the following:

(a) Engage in any activity for which an active license or certificate is required.

(b) Represent that he or she has an active license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   (AB 1659)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

(a) An inactive healing arts license or certificate issued pursuant to this article shall be renewed during the same time period at which an active license or certificate is renewed. In order to renew a license or certificate issued pursuant to this article, the holder thereof need not comply with any continuing education requirement for renewal of an active license or certificate.

(b) The renewal fee for a license or certificate in an active status shall apply also for renewal of a license or certificate in an inactive status, unless a lower fee has been established by the issuing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 249, Sec. 3.   (AB 1659)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

704.

In order for the holder of an inactive license or certificate issued pursuant to this article to restore his or her license or certificate to an active status, the holder of an inactive license or certificate shall comply with all the following:

(a) Pay the renewal fee; provided, that the renewal fee shall be waived for a physician and surgeon who certifies to the Medical Board of California that license restoration is for the sole purpose of providing voluntary, unpaid service to a public agency, not-for-profit agency, institution, or corporation which provides medical services to indigent patients in medically underserved or critical-need population areas of the state.

(b) If the board requires completion of continuing education for renewers of an active license or certificate, complete continuing education equivalent to that required for a single license renewal period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 631, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Federal Personnel and Tribal Health Programs [710. - 719.]

710.

It is the policy of the State of California that, consistent with high quality health care services, persons with skills, knowledge and experience obtained in the armed services of the United States should be permitted to apply such learning and contribute to the health manpower needs of the state at the maximum level of responsibility and skill for which they are qualified.

To this end, the rules and regulations of boards under this division shall provide for methods of evaluating education, training, and experience obtained in military service if such training is applicable to the requirements of that profession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1592.)
-------------------------------------------

715.

Unless otherwise required by federal law or regulation, no board under this division which licenses dentists, physicians and surgeons, podiatrists, or nurses may require a person to obtain or maintain any license to practice a profession or render services in the State of California if one of the following applies:

(a) The person practicing a profession or rendering services does so exclusively as an employee of a department, bureau, office, division, or similarly constituted agency of the federal government, and provides medical services exclusively on a federal reservation or at any facility wholly supported by and maintained by the United States government.

(b) The person practicing a profession or rendering services does so solely pursuant to a contract with the federal government on a federal reservation or at any facility wholly supported and maintained by the United States government.

(c) The person practicing a profession or rendering services does so pursuant to, or as a part of a program or project conducted or administered by a department, bureau, office, division, or similarly constituted agency of the federal government which by federal statute expressly exempts persons practicing a profession or rendering services as part of the program or project from state laws requiring licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 220, Sec. 7.5.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

716.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a board under this division may deny issuance of a license to an applicant or take disciplinary action against the holder of a California license for acts or omissions committed by the applicant or licensee in the course of professional practice or rendering services described in Section 715 if both of the following apply:

(a) The acts or omissions committed by the applicant or licensee constituted grounds for denial or discipline pursuant to the laws of this state governing licensees or applicants for licensure for the profession or vocation in question. 

(b) The acts or omissions constituting the basis for denial or discipline by the agency were not authorized, exempted or rendered inconsistent by federal statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 239, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

717.

This article is not intended to address the scope of practice of a dentist, physician and surgeon, or nurse licensed under this division, and nothing in this article shall be construed to restrict, expand, alter, or modify the existing scope of practice established by federal statute or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 239, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

718.

A physician and surgeon who is not licensed in this state but who is a commissioned officer on active duty in the medical corps of any branch of the armed forces of the United States may engage in the practice of medicine as part of a residency, fellowship, or clinical training program if all the following conditions are met:

(a) The residency, fellowship, or clinical training program is conducted by a branch of the armed forces of the United States at a health facility on a federal reservation and limited in enrollment to military physicians on active duty in the medical corps of a branch of the armed forces of the United States.

(b) The residency, fellowship, or clinical training program, as part of its program, contracts with or affiliates with a similar program in or at a health facility not on a federal reservation to offer specific courses or training not available at the facility located on the federal reservation.

(c) The officers enrolled in the residency, fellowship, or clinical training program restrict their practice only to patients who are seen as part of their duties in the program.

(d) The compensation received by the officers enrolled in the residency, fellowship, or clinical training program is limited to their regular pay and allowances as commissioned officers.

(e) The officers enrolled in the training programs or portions of training programs not conducted on a federal reservation shall register with the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California on a form provided by the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 886, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

719.

(a) A person who is licensed as a health care practitioner in any other state and is employed by a tribal health program, as defined in Section 1603 of Title 25 of the United States Code, shall be exempt from any licensing requirement described in this division with respect to acts authorized under the person’s license where the tribal health program performs the services described in the contract or compact of the tribal health program under the Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 450 et seq.).

(b) For purposes of this section, “health care practitioner” means any person who engages in acts that are the subject of licensure or regulation under the law of any other
 state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 119, Sec. 2.   (AB 1896)   Effective January 1, 2013.   See similar section added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------

719.

(a) A person who possesses a current, valid license as a health care practitioner in any other state and is employed by a tribal health program, as defined in Section 1603 of Title 25 of the United States Code, shall be exempt from any licensing requirement described in this division with respect to acts authorized under the person’s license where the tribal health program performs the services described in the contract or compact of the tribal health program under the Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 450 et seq.).

(b) For purposes of this section, “health care practitioner” means any person who engages in acts that are the subject of licensure or regulation under the law of any other
 state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Unprofessional Conduct [725. - 733.]

725.

(a) Repeated acts of clearly excessive prescribing, furnishing, dispensing, or administering of drugs or treatment, repeated acts of clearly excessive use of diagnostic procedures, or repeated acts of clearly excessive use of diagnostic or treatment facilities as determined by the standard of the community of licensees is unprofessional conduct for a physician and surgeon, dentist, podiatrist, psychologist, physical therapist, chiropractor, optometrist, speech-language pathologist, or audiologist.

(b) Any person who engages in repeated acts of clearly excessive prescribing or administering of drugs or treatment is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than 60 days nor more than 180 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) A practitioner who has a medical basis for prescribing, furnishing, dispensing, or administering dangerous drugs or prescription controlled substances shall not be subject to disciplinary action or prosecution under this section.

(d) No physician and surgeon shall be subject to disciplinary action pursuant to this section for treating intractable pain in compliance with Section 2241.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

726.

(a) The commission of any act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient, client, or customer constitutes unprofessional conduct and grounds for disciplinary action for any person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division.

(b) This section shall not apply to consensual sexual contact between a licensee and his or her spouse or person in an equivalent domestic relationship when that licensee provides medical treatment, other than psychotherapeutic treatment, to his or her spouse or person in an equivalent domestic relationship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 510, Sec. 3.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

727.

The provisions of subdivision (2) of Section 1103 of the Evidence Code shall apply in disciplinary proceedings brought against a licensee for acts in violation of Section 726.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 731 by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

728.

(a) Any psychotherapist or employer of a psychotherapist who becomes aware through a client that the client had alleged sexual intercourse or alleged sexual behavior or sexual contact with a previous psychotherapist during the course of a prior treatment shall provide to the client a brochure developed pursuant to Section 337 that delineates the rights of, and remedies for, clients who have been involved sexually with their psychotherapists. Further, the psychotherapist or employer shall discuss the brochure with the client.

(b) Failure to comply with this section constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(c) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Psychotherapist” means any of the following:

(A) A physician and surgeon specializing in the practice of psychiatry or practicing psychotherapy.

(B) A psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900).

(C) A psychological assistant.

(D) A registered psychologist.

(E) A trainee under the supervision of a licensed psychologist.

(F) A marriage and family therapist.

(G) An associate marriage and family therapist.

(H) A marriage and family therapist trainee.

(I) A licensed educational psychologist.

(J) A clinical social worker.

(K) An associate clinical social worker.

(L) A licensed professional clinical counselor.

(M) An associate professional clinical counselor, as specified in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10).

(N) A clinical counselor trainee, as specified in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10).

(2) “Sexual behavior” means inappropriate contact or communication of a sexual nature. “Sexual behavior” does not include the provision of
 appropriate therapeutic interventions relating to sexual issues.

(3) “Sexual contact” means the touching of an intimate part of another person.

(4) “Intimate part” and “touching” have the same meanings as defined in subdivisions (g) and (e), respectively, of Section 243.4 of the Penal Code.

(5) “The course of a prior treatment” means the period of time during which a client first commences treatment for services that a psychotherapist is authorized to provide under his or her scope of practice, or that the psychotherapist represents to the client as being within his or her scope of practice, until the psychotherapist-client relationship is terminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 778, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 2968)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

729.

(a) Any physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor, or any person holding themselves out to be a physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor, who engages in an act of sexual intercourse, sodomy, oral copulation, or sexual contact with a patient or client, or with a former patient or client when the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of engaging in those acts, unless the physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor has referred the patient or client to an independent
 and objective physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor recommended by a third-party physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor for treatment, is guilty of sexual exploitation by a physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor.

(b) Sexual exploitation by a physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor is a public offense:

(1) An act in violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period
 of not more than six months, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) Multiple acts in violation of subdivision (a) with a single victim, when the offender has no prior conviction for sexual exploitation, shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than six months, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(3) An act or acts in violation of subdivision (a) with two or more victims shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a period of 16 months, two years, or three years, and a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000); or the act or acts shall be punishable by
 imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(4) Two or more acts in violation of subdivision (a) with a single victim, when the offender has at least one prior conviction for sexual exploitation, shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a period of 16 months, two years, or three years, and a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000); or the act or acts shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(5) An act or acts in violation of subdivision (a) with two or more
 victims, and the offender has at least one prior conviction for sexual exploitation, shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a period of 16 months, two years, or three years, and a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

For purposes of subdivision (a), in no instance shall consent of the patient or client be a defense. However, physicians and surgeons shall not be guilty of sexual exploitation for touching any intimate part of a patient or client unless the touching is outside the scope of medical examination and treatment, or the touching is done for sexual gratification.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Psychotherapist” has the same meaning as defined in Section
 728.

(2) “Alcohol and drug abuse counselor” means an individual who holds themselves out to be an alcohol or drug abuse professional or paraprofessional.

(3) “Sexual contact” means sexual intercourse or the touching of an intimate part of a patient for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification, or abuse.

(4) “Intimate part” and “touching” have the same meanings as defined in Section 243.4 of the Penal Code.

(d) In the investigation and prosecution of a violation of this section, no person shall seek to obtain disclosure of any confidential files of other patients, clients, or former patients or clients of the physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst,
 student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor.

(e) This section does not apply to sexual contact between a physician and surgeon and their spouse or person in an equivalent domestic relationship when that physician and surgeon provides medical treatment, other than psychotherapeutic treatment, to their spouse or person in an equivalent domestic relationship.

(f) If a physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor in a professional partnership or similar group has sexual contact with a patient in violation of this section, another physician and surgeon, psychotherapist, research psychoanalyst, student research psychoanalyst, or alcohol and drug abuse counselor in the
 partnership or group shall not be subject to action under this section solely because of the occurrence of that sexual contact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 5.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

730.

Any person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division shall not perform any medical evaluation for which the evaluator is required to be certified as a qualified medical evaluator pursuant to Section 139.2 of the Labor Code without having first obtained that certification. No person shall be in violation of this section if the person is certified as a qualified medical evaluator at the time of assignment to a three-member panel under subdivision (h) of Section 139.2 of the Labor Code or, if the injured worker is represented, if the person is certified as a qualified medical evaluator at the time the injured worker is referred for a medical evaluation. A violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct and grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

730.5.

(a) It is unprofessional conduct and a crime, as provided in Section 4935, for a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician, dentist, or podiatrist to direct or supervise the performance of acupuncture involving the application of a needle to the body of a human being by a person licensed under this division who is not licensed pursuant to the Acupuncture Licensure Act established by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 4925).

(b) It is unprofessional conduct and a crime, as provided in Section 4935, for a person licensed under this division who is not licensed pursuant to the Acupuncture Licensure Act established by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 4925) to perform acupuncture involving the application of a needle to the body of a human being at the direction or under the supervision of a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician, dentist, or podiatrist.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 730 (as added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 400) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

(a) Any person licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise subject to regulation pursuant to this division who engages in, or who aids or abets in, a violation of Section 266h, 266i, 315, 316, or 318 of, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 647 of, the Penal Code occurring in the work premises of, or work area under the direct professional supervision or control of, that person, shall be guilty of unprofessional conduct. The license, certification, or registration of that person shall be subject to denial, suspension, or revocation by the appropriate regulatory entity under this division.

(b) In addition to any penalty provided under any other provision of law, a violation of subdivision (a) shall subject the person to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first offense, and not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each subsequent offense, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought by any district attorney. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty recovered shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 971, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

(a) A physician and surgeon and a dentist shall refund any amount that a patient has paid for services rendered that has subsequently been paid to the physician and surgeon or dentist by a third-party payor and that constitutes a duplicate payment. The refund shall be made as follows:

(1) If the patient requests a refund, within 30 days following the request from that patient for a refund if the duplicate payment has been received, or within 30 days of receipt of the duplicate payment if the duplicate payment has not been received.

(2) If the patient does not request a refund, within 90 days of the date the physician and surgeon or dentist knows, or should have known, of the receipt of the duplicate payment, the physician and surgeon or dentist shall notify the patient of the duplicate payment, and the duplicate payment shall be refunded within 30 days unless the patient requests that a credit balance be retained.

(b) Violation of this section shall constitute unprofessional conduct. Disciplinary proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)) or the Dental Practice Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600)), as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 765, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

(a) A licentiate shall not obstruct a patient in obtaining a prescription drug or device that has been legally prescribed or ordered for that patient. A violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct by the licentiate and shall subject the licentiate to disciplinary or administrative action by their licensing agency.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a licentiate shall dispense drugs and devices, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 4024, pursuant to a lawful order or prescription unless one of the following circumstances exists:

(1) Based solely on the licentiate’s professional training and judgment,
 dispensing pursuant to the order or the prescription is contrary to law, or the licentiate determines that the prescribed drug or device would cause a harmful drug interaction or would otherwise adversely affect the patient’s medical condition.

(2) The prescription drug or device is not in stock. If an order, other than an order described in Section 4019, or prescription cannot be dispensed because the drug or device is not in stock, the licentiate shall take one of the following actions:

(A) Immediately notify the patient and arrange for the drug or device to be delivered to the site or directly to the patient in a timely manner.

(B) Promptly transfer the prescription to another pharmacy known to stock the prescription
 drug or device that is near enough to the site from which the prescription or order is transferred, to ensure the patient has timely access to the drug or device.

(C) Return the prescription to the patient and refer the patient. The licentiate shall make a reasonable effort to refer the patient to a pharmacy that stocks the prescription drug or device that is near enough to the referring site to ensure that the patient has timely access to the drug or device.

(3) The licentiate refuses on ethical, moral, or religious grounds to dispense a drug or device pursuant to an order or prescription. A licentiate may decline to dispense a prescription drug or device on this basis only if the licentiate has previously notified
 their employer, in writing, of the drug or class of drugs to which the licentiate objects, and the licentiate’s employer can, without creating undue hardship, provide a reasonable accommodation of the licentiate’s objection. The licentiate’s employer shall establish protocols that ensure that the patient has timely access to the prescribed drug or device despite the licentiate’s refusal to dispense the prescription or order. For purposes of this section, “reasonable accommodation” and “undue hardship” shall have the same meaning as applied to those terms pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “prescription drug or device” has the same meaning as the definition in Section 4022.

(d) This section
 applies to emergency contraception drug therapy, over-the-counter contraceptives, and self-administered prescription-only hormonal contraceptives described in Section 4052.3.

(e) This section imposes no duty on a licentiate to dispense a drug or device pursuant to a prescription or order without payment for the drug or device, including payment directly by the patient or through a third-party payer accepted by the licentiate or payment of any required copayment by the patient.

(f) The notice to consumers required by Section 4122 shall include a statement that describes patients’ rights relative to the requirements
 of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   (AB 50)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.7 Opioid Medication [740. - 742.]

740.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Administer” means the direct application of a drug or device to the body of a patient by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or other means.

(b) “Order” means an order entered on the chart or medical record of a patient registered in an inpatient health facility by or on the order of a prescriber.

(c) “Prescriber” means a person licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise subject to regulation pursuant to this division, or an initiative act referred to in this division, who is authorized to prescribe prescription drugs. “Prescriber” does not include a person licensed under the Veterinary
 Medicine Practice Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 3.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

741.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, when prescribing an opioid or benzodiazepine medication to a patient, a prescriber shall do the following:

(1) Offer the patient a prescription for naloxone hydrochloride or another drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the complete or partial reversal of opioid-induced respiratory depression when one or more of the following conditions are present:

(A) The prescription dosage for the patient is 90 or more morphine milligram equivalents of an opioid medication per day.

(B) An opioid medication is
 prescribed within a year from the date a prescription for benzodiazepine has been dispensed to the patient.

(C) The patient presents with an increased risk for opioid overdose, including a patient with a history of opioid overdose, a patient with a history of opioid use disorder, or a patient at risk for returning to a high dose of opioid medication to which the patient is no longer tolerant.

(2) Consistent with the existing standard of care, provide education to the patient on opioid overdose prevention and the use of naloxone hydrochloride or another drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the complete or partial reversal of opioid-induced respiratory depression.

(3) Consistent with the
 existing standard of care, provide education on opioid overdose prevention and the use of naloxone hydrochloride or another drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the complete or partial reversal of opioid-induced respiratory depression to one or more persons designated by the patient, or, for a patient who is a minor, to the minor’s parent or guardian.

(b) A prescriber is not required to provide the education specified in paragraphs (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) if the patient receiving the prescription declines the education or has received the education within the past 24 months. 

(c) This section does not apply to a prescriber under any of the following circumstances:

 (1) When prescribing to an inmate or a youth under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the Division of Juvenile Justice within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) When ordering medications to be administered to a patient while the patient is in either an inpatient or outpatient setting.

(3) When prescribing medications to a patient who is terminally ill, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 11159.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 714)   Effective September 5, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

742.

A prescriber who fails to offer a prescription, as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 741, or fails to provide the education and use information required by paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 741 shall be referred to the appropriate licensing board solely for the imposition of administrative sanctions deemed appropriate by that board. This section does not create a private right of action against a prescriber, and does not limit a prescriber’s liability for the negligent failure to diagnose or treat a patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   (AB 2760)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.8. Three Day Rule for Narcotic Drug Prescriptions [750. - 750.]

750.

(a) For purposes of this section, “prescriber” means a person authorized to write or issue a prescription pursuant to Section 11150 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) Each board that licenses a prescriber shall develop informational and educational material regarding the federal Drug Enforcement Administration’s “Three Day Rule,” as codified in subsection (b) of Section 1306.07 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, in order to ensure prescriber awareness of existing medication-assisted treatment pathways to serve patients with substance use
 disorder.

(2) Each board shall annually disseminate the informational and educational material developed pursuant to paragraph (1) to each licensed prescriber’s email address on file with the board.

(3) Each board shall post the informational and educational material developed pursuant to paragraph (1) on their internet website.

(4) The requirements of this subdivision shall not apply to the Veterinary Medical Board.
